test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-u_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - táálu:
    táálu+N+Sg+Nom:  táálu
    táálu+N+Sg+Gen:  tálo
    táálu+N+Sg+Ill:  táálun
    táálu+N+Sg+Loc:  tááloost
    táálu+N+Sg+Com:  tááloin
    táálu+N+Sg+Abe:  tálottáá
    táálu+N+Ess:  táállun
    táálu+N+Pl+Nom:  táloh
    táálu+N+Pl+Gen:  táloi
    táálu+N+Pl+Acc:  táloid
    táálu+N+Pl+Ill:  tááloid
    táálu+N+Pl+Loc:  táloin
    táálu+N+Pl+Com:  táloiguin
    táálu+N+Pl+Abe:  táloittáá

  Noun - náálu:
    náálu+N+Sg+Nom:  náálu
    náálu+N+Sg+Gen:  náálu
    náálu+N+Sg+Ill:  náálun
    náálu+N+Sg+Loc:  náálust
    náálu+N+Sg+Com:  nááloin
    náálu+N+Sg+Abe:  náluttáá
    náálu+N+Ess:  náállun
    náálu+N+Pl+Nom:  nááluh
    náálu+N+Pl+Gen: [náálui, nálui]
    náálu+N+Pl+Acc:  nááluid
    náálu+N+Pl+Ill:  nááloid
    náálu+N+Pl+Loc:  nááluin
    náálu+N+Pl+Com:  náluiguin
    náálu+N+Pl+Abe:  náluittáá

  Noun - táálu:
    táálu+N+Sg+Nom:  táálu
    táálu+N+Sg+Gen:  táálu
    táálu+N+Sg+Ill:  táálun
    táálu+N+Sg+Loc:  táálust
    táálu+N+Sg+Com:  tááloin
    táálu+N+Sg+Abe:  táluttáá
    táálu+N+Ess:  táállun
    táálu+N+Pl+Nom:  tááluh
    táálu+N+Pl+Gen: [táálui, tálui]
    táálu+N+Pl+Acc:  tááluid
    táálu+N+Pl+Ill:  tááloid
    táálu+N+Pl+Loc:  tááluin
    táálu+N+Pl+Com:  táluiguin
    táálu+N+Pl+Abe:  táluittáá

  Noun - stáálu:
    stáálu+N+Sg+Nom:  stáálu
    stáálu+N+Sg+Gen:  stáálu
    stáálu+N+Sg+Ill:  stáálun
    stáálu+N+Sg+Loc:  stáálust
    stáálu+N+Sg+Com:  stááloin
    stáálu+N+Sg+Abe:  stáluttáá
    stáálu+N+Ess:  stáállun
    stáálu+N+Pl+Nom:  stááluh
    stáálu+N+Pl+Gen: [stáálui, stálui, stáloi]
    stáálu+N+Pl+Acc:  stááluid
    stáálu+N+Pl+Ill:  stááloid
    stáálu+N+Pl+Loc:  stááluin
    stáálu+N+Pl+Com:  stáluiguin
    stáálu+N+Pl+Abe:  stáluittáá

  Noun - jáámu:
    jáámu+N+Sg+Nom:  jáámu
    jáámu+N+Sg+Gen:  jáámu
    jáámu+N+Sg+Ill:  jáámun
    jáámu+N+Sg+Loc:  jáámust
    jáámu+N+Sg+Com:  jáámoin
    jáámu+N+Sg+Abe:  jámuttáá
    jáámu+N+Ess:  jáámmun
    jáámu+N+Pl+Nom:  jáámuh
    jáámu+N+Pl+Gen: [jáámui, jámui]
    jáámu+N+Pl+Acc:  jáámuid
    jáámu+N+Pl+Ill:  jáámoid
    jáámu+N+Pl+Loc:  jáámuin
    jáámu+N+Pl+Com:  jámuiguin
    jáámu+N+Pl+Abe:  jámuittáá

  Noun - máánu:
    máánu+N+Sg+Nom:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Gen:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Ill:  máánun
    máánu+N+Sg+Loc:  máánust
    máánu+N+Sg+Com:  máánuin
    máánu+N+Sg+Abe:  mánuttáá
    máánu+N+Ess:  máánnun
    máánu+N+Pl+Nom:  máánuh
    máánu+N+Pl+Gen:  máánui
    máánu+N+Pl+Acc:  máánuid
    máánu+N+Pl+Ill:  máánuid
    máánu+N+Pl+Loc:  máánuin
    máánu+N+Pl+Com:  mánuiguin
    máánu+N+Pl+Abe:  mánuittáá

  Noun - láátu:
    láátu+N+Sg+Nom:  láátu
    láátu+N+Sg+Gen:  láđo
    láátu+N+Sg+Ill:  láátun
    láátu+N+Sg+Loc:  lááđoost
    láátu+N+Sg+Com:  lááđoin
    láátu+N+Sg+Abe:  láđottáá
    láátu+N+Ess:  lááttun
    láátu+N+Pl+Nom:  láđoh
    láátu+N+Pl+Gen:  láđoi
    láátu+N+Pl+Acc:  láđoid
    láátu+N+Pl+Ill:  lááđoid
    láátu+N+Pl+Loc:  láđoin
    láátu+N+Pl+Com:  láđoiguin
    láátu+N+Pl+Abe:  láđoittáá

  Noun - pááru:
    pááru+N+Sg+Nom:  pááru
    pááru+N+Sg+Gen:  páro
    pááru+N+Sg+Ill:  páárun
    pááru+N+Sg+Loc:  páároost
    pááru+N+Sg+Com:  páároin
    pááru+N+Sg+Abe:  párottáá
    pááru+N+Ess:  páárrun
    pááru+N+Pl+Nom:  pároh
    pááru+N+Pl+Gen:  pároi
    pááru+N+Pl+Acc:  pároid
    pááru+N+Pl+Ill:  pároid
    pááru+N+Pl+Loc:  pároin
    pááru+N+Pl+Com:  pároiguin
    pááru+N+Pl+Abe:  pároittáá

  Noun - pááru:
    pááru+N+Sg+Nom:  pááru
    pááru+N+Sg+Gen:  pááru
    pááru+N+Sg+Ill:  páárun
    pááru+N+Sg+Loc:  páárust
    pááru+N+Sg+Com:  pááruin
    pááru+N+Sg+Abe:  páruttáá
    pááru+N+Ess:  páárrun
    pááru+N+Pl+Nom:  pááruh
    pááru+N+Pl+Gen: [páárui, párui]
    pááru+N+Pl+Acc:  pááruid
    pááru+N+Pl+Ill:  páároid
    pááru+N+Pl+Loc:  pááruin
    pááru+N+Pl+Com:  páruiguin
    pááru+N+Pl+Abe:  páruittáá

  Noun - láátu:
    láátu+N+Sg+Nom:  láátu
    láátu+N+Sg+Gen:  lááđu
    láátu+N+Sg+Ill:  láátun
    láátu+N+Sg+Loc:  lááđust
    láátu+N+Sg+Com:  lááđoin
    láátu+N+Sg+Abe:  láđuttáá
    láátu+N+Ess:  lááttun
    láátu+N+Pl+Nom:  lááđuh
    láátu+N+Pl+Gen:  lááđui
    láátu+N+Pl+Acc:  lááđuid
    láátu+N+Pl+Ill:  lááđoid
    láátu+N+Pl+Loc:  lááđuin
    láátu+N+Pl+Com:  láđuiguin
    láátu+N+Pl+Abe:  láđuittáá

  Noun - máátu:
    máátu+N+Sg+Nom:  máátu
    máátu+N+Sg+Gen:  mááđu
    máátu+N+Sg+Ill:  máátun
    máátu+N+Sg+Loc:  mááđust
    máátu+N+Sg+Com:  máđoin
    máátu+N+Sg+Abe:  máđuttáá
    máátu+N+Ess:  mááttun
    máátu+N+Pl+Nom:  mááđuh
    máátu+N+Pl+Gen: [mááđui, máđui]
    máátu+N+Pl+Acc:  mááđuid
    máátu+N+Pl+Ill:  máđoid
    máátu+N+Pl+Loc:  mááđuin
    máátu+N+Pl+Com:  máđuiguin
    máátu+N+Pl+Abe:  máđuittáá

  Noun - láávu:
    láávu+N+Sg+Nom:  láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Gen:  láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Ill:  láávun
    láávu+N+Sg+Loc:  láávust
    láávu+N+Sg+Com:  láávoin
    láávu+N+Sg+Abe:  lávuttáá
    láávu+N+Ess:  láávvun
    láávu+N+Pl+Nom:  láávuh
    láávu+N+Pl+Gen:  láávui
    láávu+N+Pl+Acc:  láávuid
    láávu+N+Pl+Ill:  láávoid
    láávu+N+Pl+Loc:  láávuin
    láávu+N+Pl+Com:  lávuiguin
    láávu+N+Pl+Abe:  lávuittáá

  Noun - piäldu:
    piäldu+N+Sg+Nom:  piäldu
    piäldu+N+Sg+Gen:  piäldu
    piäldu+N+Sg+Ill:  piäldun
    piäldu+N+Sg+Loc:  piäldust
    piäldu+N+Sg+Com:  piäldoin
    piäldu+N+Sg+Abe:  piälduttáá
    piäldu+N+Ess:  piäldun
    piäldu+N+Pl+Nom:  piälduh
    piäldu+N+Pl+Gen: [piäldui, piäldui]
    piäldu+N+Pl+Acc:  piälduid
    piäldu+N+Pl+Ill:  piäldoid
    piäldu+N+Pl+Loc:  piälduin
    piäldu+N+Pl+Com:  piälduiguin
    piäldu+N+Pl+Abe:  piälduittáá

  Noun - piärgu:
    piärgu+N+Sg+Nom:  piärgu
    piärgu+N+Sg+Gen:  piärgu
    piärgu+N+Sg+Ill:  piärgun
    piärgu+N+Sg+Loc:  piärgust
    piärgu+N+Sg+Com:  piärgoin
    piärgu+N+Sg+Abe:  piärguttáá
    piärgu+N+Ess:  piärgun
    piärgu+N+Pl+Nom:  piärguh
    piärgu+N+Pl+Gen: [piärgui, piärgui]
    piärgu+N+Pl+Acc:  piärguid
    piärgu+N+Pl+Ill:  piärgoid
    piärgu+N+Pl+Loc:  piärguin
    piärgu+N+Pl+Com:  piärguiguin
    piärgu+N+Pl+Abe:  piärguittáá

  Noun - piätu:
    piätu+N+Sg+Nom:  piätu
    piätu+N+Sg+Gen:  piäđu
    piätu+N+Sg+Ill:  piätun
    piätu+N+Sg+Loc:  piäđust
    piätu+N+Sg+Com:  piäđoin
    piätu+N+Sg+Abe:  piäđuttáá
    piätu+N+Ess:  piättun
    piätu+N+Pl+Nom:  piäđuh
    piätu+N+Pl+Gen: [piäđui, piäđui]
    piätu+N+Pl+Acc:  piäđuid
    piätu+N+Pl+Ill:  piäđoid
    piätu+N+Pl+Loc:  piäđuin
    piätu+N+Pl+Com:  piäđuiguin
    piätu+N+Pl+Abe:  piäđuittáá

  Noun - kiäčču:
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäčču
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäju
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäčun
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäjust
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Com:  kiäijoin
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäjuttáá
    kiäčču+N+Ess:  kiäččun
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäjuh
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Gen: [kiäjui, kiäjui]
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäjuid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäijoid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäjuin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Com:  kiäjuiguin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäjuittáá

  Noun - vuággu:
    vuággu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuággu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuágu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuágun
    vuággu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuágust
    vuággu+N+Sg+Com:  vuággoin
    vuággu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáguttáá
    vuággu+N+Ess:  vuággun
    vuággu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáguh
    vuággu+N+Pl+Gen: [vuágui, vuágui]
    vuággu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáguid
    vuággu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuággoid
    vuággu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáguin
    vuággu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáguiguin
    vuággu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáguittáá
